Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.048

Special death benefit—Death in the course of employment—Death from disease or infection arising from employment—Annual adjustment.

(1) A two hundred fourteen thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.

(2) The benefit under this section shall be paid only when death occurs: (a) As a result of injuries sustained in the course of employment; or (b) as a result of an occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. There is no statute of limitations for this benefit. The department of labor and industries shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

(3) The department of labor and industries shall determine eligibility under subsection (2) of this section for the special death benefit for any beneficiaries who were denied the special death benefit for failing to meet the statute of limitations under Title 51 RCW. If the department of labor and industries determines the beneficiary is eligible for the special death benefit the department must provide the beneficiary an option to reelect their pension benefit under RCW 41.26.510(2) and if the member elects an ongoing pension benefit the department must pay the beneficiary retroactive to the date of the member's death.

(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2010, and every year thereafter, the department shall determine the following information:

(i) The index for the 2008 calendar year, to be known as "index A;"

(ii) The index for the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known as "index B;" and

(iii) The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.

(b) The value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original death benefit and shall be applied beginning every July 1st. In no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:

(i) Produce a benefit which is lower than two hundred fourteen thousand dollars;

(ii) Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(iii) Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

(c) For the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar year, that year's average consumer price index — Seattle, Washington area for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor.

[ 2024 c 304 s 101; 2010 c 261 s 2; 2009 c 523 s 4; 2007 c 487 s 2; 2006 c 351 s 1; 1996 c 226 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—2010 c 261: "Sections 2 and 7 of this act apply to the benefits of all members killed in the course of employment since January 1, 2009." [ 2010 c 261 s 9.]

Effective date—1996 c 226: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 28, 1996]." [ 1996 c 226 s 4.]